
























Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

 

1 Abstract 5 

2 Introduction 7 
2.1 The Energy Supply Chain 7 

2.1.1 Generation 7 
2.1.2 Transmission 8 
2.1.3 Distribution 8 
2.1.4 Retail 8 

2.2 Regulated and Deregulated Markets 9 
2.3 Existing Retailers 13 
2.4 Challenges of Renewables 13 
2.5 Using Ethereum in Electricity Markets 17 

2.5.1 Ethereum 17 
2.5.2 Tokens 18 
2.5.3 Stable Tokens 18 
2.5.4 Payment Channels 19 
2.5.5 Proof of Stake and Casper 20 

3 Value Propositions 21 
3.1 Short Term - Energy Retailer 22 

3.1.1 Lower Variable Costs 22 
3.1.2 Eliminating Bad Debts 22 
3.1.3 Lower Marketing Expenses 23 

3.2 Long Term - Distributed Storage and Open Markets 23 
3.2.1 Enabling Efficient Markets 23 
3.2.2 Natively Support P2P Markets 24 
3.2.3 Integrate ISO Wholesale Markets 24 

4 Intelligent Agent 25 
4.1 Basic Usage 26 
4.2 Agent Registration & Key Generation 26 
4.3 Advanced Usage 28 
4.4 Agent Energy Trading 29 

4.4.1 Day-Ahead and Real-Time Markets 29 
4.4.2 Demand Response 32 
4.4.3 Intelligent Economically Driven Decisions 33 

4.5 Secondary Uses of the Agent 34 
4.5.1 Storing Cryptocurrency 34 
4.5.2 Proof-of-Stake Signing 34 
4.5.3 Ethereum API for IoT 35 

4.6 Integration and Testing 36 

2 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

5 Tokens 37 
5.1 The BOLT Token 37 

5.1.1 BOLT Redemption 38 
5.1.2 The Fee Vault: Karabraxos 38 

5.3 The GRID Token 39 
5.3.1 Agent Staking 39 
5.3.2 Raiden Usage 40 
5.3.3 GRID Redemption for Agent Devices 40 

6 Business Model 41 
6.1 Markup on Energy 41 
6.2 Raiden Network Transaction Fees 42 
6.3 Interest on BOLT deposits 43 
6.4 Sales of Agents 44 
6.5 Roadmap 44 

6.5.1 Phase 1: Edison Epoch (Q4 2017 - Q2 2018) 44 
6.5.1.1 First Utility 44 
6.5.1.2 Agent Prototype 44 
6.5.1.3 Establish Content Delivery Network 45 
6.5.1.4 Updates to the Client 45 

6.5.2 Phase 2: Tesla Epoch (Q2 2018 - Q1 2019) 45 
6.5.2.1 Scalable Hardware Production 45 
6.5.2.2 More Utilities 46 
6.5.2.3 Raiden Hub 46 
6.5.2.4 Better Decisions from More APIs 46 

6.5.3 Phase 3: Musk Epoch (Q2 2019 and beyond) 46 
6.5.3.1 Full Hardware Production Scalability 47 
6.5.3.2 Agent AI Optimization 47 
6.5.3.3 International Utilities Expansion 47 

6.6 Use of Funds 47 
6.6.1 Forming Utilities 49 
6.6.2 Legal Work 50 
6.6.3 Marketing 51 
6.6.4 Product 51 

7 Experience and Team 52 
7.1 Team: 54 

7.1.1 Alex Miller 54 
7.1.2 Karl Kreder 54 
7.1.3 Mark D’Agostino 54 
7.1.4 Claudia Pop 55 
7.1.5 Rachel Epstein 55 

7.2 Advisors 55 

3 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

7.2.1 Joseph Lubin 55 
7.2.2 Jeffrey Char 55 
7.2.3 Rikiyai Abe 56 
7.2.4 John Lilic 56 
7.2.5 Matt Corva 56 
7.2.6 Igor Lilic 57 
7.2.7 Mike Goldin 57 
7.2.8 Bashar Lazaar 57 

8 Appendix 58 
8.1 State Channels Research 58 
8.2 Tesla Powerwall Payback Calculations 59 

 

 

  

4 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

1 Abstract 
In the past ten years, the cost of distributed energy resources (DERs), such as solar panels and                 

wind turbines has decreased significantly. This has led to expeditious and widespread adoption.             

Additionally, battery prices are rapidly decreasing, making them economically viable to           

supplement variable-generation renewable-resources by storing energy for the electrical grid.          

The confluence of these developments has created an emergent electrical grid, where the             

means of production are less centralized, and the control systems are less likely to be strictly                

top-down. The concept of independently owned and controlled DERs is known as the             

transactive energy grid.  

 

The transactive grid promises to increase durability of the electrical grid, while simultaneously             

increasing efficiency, and enabling the adoption of more renewable energy. However, the            

distributed nature of the transactive grid, poses two major challenges, primarily related to             

technical control and grid administration. Both challenges can potentially be addressed using a             

blockchain. The ConsenSys energy team has several years of experience building and            

demonstrating proof-of-concept blockchain-based distributed energy resource management       

solutions. Through this experience, ConsenSys identified the opportunity to form Grid+, which            

will build natively Ethereum-based utilities in deregulated markets. Grid+ will demonstrate           

production ready blockchain-based energy solutions at scale in competitive commercial          

environments. In doing so, Grid+ will enable the transactive grid of the future while proving the                

advantages of Ethereum over incumbent technologies. 

 

Grid+ is developing a hardware and software stack to create a secure Ethereum enabled              

gateway and connect Internet-of-Things (IoT) devices. The hardware gateway, or “smart energy            

agent”, is an Internet-enabled, always-on appliance which will securely store cryptocurrencies           

and process payments for electricity in real-time. The agent will also programmatically buy and              

sell electricity on behalf of the user and intelligently manage smart loads (e.g. Tesla Powerwall               

or Nest thermostat). The software stack will work in conjunction with the smart energy agent to                

make payments, using a combination of Grid+ designed payment-channels and a Raiden            

network hub (when available). Grid+ is developing a system architecture that allows a typical              

user to leverage cryptocurrencies while remaining unaware of it’s use. Interestingly, the            

implementation of a secure, always-on system, with low friction payment rails, provides a             

missing piece of critical infrastructure in the broader cryptocurrency ecosystem. The Grid+            

5 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

infrastructure has many uses beyond electricity and will be key to enabling the widespread              

adoption of cryptocurrencies. 

 

 

  

6 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

2 Introduction 

2.1 The Energy Supply Chain 

Before the Grid+ system is explained in great detail, a brief introduction of the current electrical                

grid, its stakeholders, and the challenges facing them will be presented. If the reader is               

intimately familiar with the electrical grid, they may skip this section.  

Presently, the services needed to provide electricity to the consumer can roughly be divided into               

four categories: generation, transmission, distribution, and retail. 

2.1.1 Generation 

Generation is electricity production by large-scale energy producers. Historically these          

producers have been hydrocarbon (or nuclear) based power plants. In recent years large wind              1

1“International Energy Outlook 201: Chapter 5- Electricity.” ​U.S. Energy Information Administration​. 
https://www.eia.gov/outlooks/ieo/pdf/electricity.pdf 

7 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

and solar farms have come online. In order for these alternative-energy entities to be              2

considered a “generator” they must have generation capacity greater than 1MW.   3

2.1.2 Transmission 

Transmission is the business of moving electricity over long distances, usually from power             

plants (generators) to consumer networks (distributors). For example, in Texas there are a             4

series of power lines that span over 500 miles, operate at high-voltage (~300 kV), and transport                

wind power from West Texas all the way to Houston. 

2.1.3 Distribution 

Distribution is the movement of electricity from the transmission (high voltage) network to the              

consumer. Distributors operate lower-voltage electrical lines that connect to individual consumer           

households or businesses. In the event of a power outage, consumers call their distributor to               5

take care of the problem (e.g. re-wiring a fallen tower). For example, AEP is the distributor in                 6

central Texas. 

2.1.4 Retail 

Retail is the sale of electricity to the consumers. Retailers are responsible for administering and               

billing consumers. Depending on your region, retailers may be known by different names (e.g.              

Retail Electricity Provider, or REP, in Texas). In deregulated markets, you might refer to the               

retailer as your “utility”. Examples include Green Mountain Energy and Reliant Energy. 

 

2Friedman, David. “Four Charts That Show Renewable Energy is on the Rise in America.” ​U.S. Dept. of 
Energy. ​(14 Nov. 2016) https://energy.gov/eere/articles/4-charts-show-renewable-energy-rise-america 
3North American Renewables Registry Operating Procedures (April 2013) 
http://www.narecs.com/wp-content/uploads/sites/2/2013/12/NAR-Operating-Procedures_April_2013.pdf 
4“Electricity Explained- How Electricity is Delivered to Consumers.” ​U.S. Energy Information and 
Administration.  
https://www.eia.gov/energyexplained/index.cfm?page=electricity_delivery 
5“Electricity Distribution.” ​Institute for Energy Research​. (2 Sept. 2014) 
http://instituteforenergyresearch.org/electricity-distribution/ 
6Contact AEP Texas, https://www.aeptexas.com/contact/  

8 

https://www.eia.gov/energyexplained/index.cfm?page=electricity_delivery
http://instituteforenergyresearch.org/electricity-distribution/


Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

Figure 1: Diagram of Electrical Grid  7

2.2 Regulated and Deregulated Markets 

Electricity markets in the United States can be divided into two distinct groups: regulated and               

deregulated. Figure 2 shows which states fall into each category. 

7 http://www.incontext.indiana.edu/2010/july-aug/images/power_fig1.gif 

9 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

Figure 2: Electricity Markets in the U.S.​   8

In regulated markets, the four entities in the energy supply chain can operate as a single,                

vertically integrated monopoly. In deregulated markets, governments mandate market         9

segmentation such that each role in the supply chain must be operated by a separate entity.                10

Deregulated markets offer substantially more competition and are more akin to a free market              

because each company must sell their services in a competitive marketplace, which is typically              

run by a government-franchised non-profit Independent System Operator (ISO). In addition to            

running these competitive markets, ISOs are also tasked with maintaining grid stability and             

8 https://www.electricchoice.com/map-deregulated-energy-markets/ 
9Woodcock, Robin Deliso. “Regulated and Deregulated Energy Markets, Explained.” ​Energy Smart Blog. 
(27 June 2014) 
https://www.energysmart.enernoc.com/regulated-and-deregulated-energy-markets-explained 
10“Regulated and Deregulated Energy Markets.” ​Customer First Renewables. 
http://www.customerfirstrenewables.com/resources/regulated-deregulated-energy-markets/ 

10 

https://www.energysmart.enernoc.com/regulated-and-deregulated-energy-markets-explained


Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

reliability via market signaling. This latter job is performed via a computer control system,              11

which the electricity industry refers to as a Supervisory Control And Data Acquisition (SCADA)              

system.  12

The SCADA system is used by the ISO to create signals for real-time energy as well as services                  

markets such as ramping control, frequency regulation, or voltage support. The market signals             

are provided to market participants, who then bid into the market and provide the services               

needed to keep the grid running at the right voltage and frequency.  

In deregulated markets, electricity retailers buy electricity at wholesale prices (in 1MWh energy             

increments) and then sell that electricity directly to consumers. Retailers are not responsible for              

powering customers directly, but are responsible for metering and billing. In addition to paying              

for generation, transmission, and distribution, consumers also pay fees to their retailer. These             

costs are largely comprised of marketing, administration, and managing risk/compliance for bad            

debts and customer funds. This can (and often does) add up to quite a large percentage, as                 

shown by the average ​price of electricity​ in various states in Figure 3.  13

11To learn more about ISOs, in particular what they do and how they operate in New England,​ see 
https://www.iso-ne.com/about 
12See​ generally “SCADA SYSTEMS.” http://www.scadasystems.net/ 
13“Electric Power Monthly.” ​U.S. Energy Information and Administration. ​(29 June 2017) 
https://www.eia.gov/electricity/monthly/epm_table_grapher.php?t=epmt_5_6_a 

11 

https://www.eia.gov/electricity/monthly/epm_table_grapher.cfm?t=epmt_5_6_a


Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

Figure 3: Residential  vs. Industrial  pricing 14 15

The difference between the residential and industrial price shown above comes mostly from the              

costs passed to the consumer from their retailer. This illustrates the amount by which electricity               

prices can be reduced from lowering costs associated with retail operations.  

14In this paper, we use “residential” and “customer” pricing interchangeably. Residential customers (e.g. 
households) are just one kind of utility customer (as opposed to commercial) and will be the target 
demographic of Grid+. 
15Industrial pricing reflects wholesale + distribution costs. Thus, the wholesale rate (the rate we are 
targeting) will be lower than these numbers. 

12 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

2.3 Existing Retailers 

Sometimes referred to as “utilities”, retailers are responsible for billing and interacting with             

customers in the last mile of the energy supply chain. An energy retailer buys electricity in the                 

wholesale markets, pays the distribution system operator a fee for getting the electricity to the               

customer, and then bills the customer for the service at a large markup over their cost of goods                  

sold. Typically only about 50% of the cost of retail electricity is used to pay for the electrical                  

energy itself. The other half is tied up in administrative burden, marketing, and risk              16

management associated with bad debts. Retailers are often slow to evolve and rarely welcome              

new technology with open arms.   17

 

When a customer signs up for a legacy utility a credit check process begins, which determines                

the likelihood that the customer will default on payments. Retailers are credit facilities, as they               

provide energy on credit and then bill consumers in arrears, usually on a monthly basis.               

Retailers deploy complex risk assessment algorithms which take into consideration the           18

percentage of potentially delinquent customers and then add the expected uncollected value            

(plus a buffer) into the rest of their customers’ bills. This means customers who pay on time are                  

subsidizing delinquent and non-paying customers. This is exacerbated by the fact that states             

regulate how long utilities must continue to provide power to their customers even after              

delinquent payments (typically 3-15 days ). 19

 

2.4 Challenges of Renewables 

The installation of photovoltaic (PV) arrays is hastening the grid’s decentralization and            

empowering consumers to become producers (turning them into “prosumers”). Approximately          

38% of residential electricity cost pays for transmission infrastructure and losses during            

16“Wholesale Vs. Retail Electricity Costs.” ​ISO New England​. 
https://www.iso-ne.com/about/what-we-do/in-depth/wholesale-vs-retail-electricity-costs 
17St. John, Jeff. “Dispatches from the Grid Edge: Tracking the (Slow) Adoption Curves for Software in the 
Utility and Energy Industries.” ​GTM Squared​. (13 April 2017) 
https://www.greentechmedia.com/squared/read/tracking-the-slow-adoption-curves-for-software-in-the-utilit
y-and-energy-in 
18Manning, Patrick and Tim Polak.“Winning Good Customers, Losing Bad Debt.” ​Bain Brief. ​(7 April 2011) 
http://www.bain.com/publications/articles/winning-good-customers-losing-bad-debt.aspx 
19 “Consumer Guide: Your Rights as a Residential Electric, Gas, or Steam Customer under HEFPA.”  ​NY 
Department of Public Service​. 
http://www3.dps.ny.gov/W/PSCWeb.nsf/979df87f099d1063852576880061e6b3/d580f8b12cdac9f985257
687006f395e?OpenDocument 

13 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

transmission. When a customer installs PV modules, however, the generated power need only             20

travel a few meters from source to load. Moving power from a person’s roof to their refrigerator                 

is significantly more efficient than sourcing it in from a generator 150 miles away. Household PV                

ownership has proven it can offer a much more efficient energy solution that can also pay for                 

itself over time. Solar adoption has outpaced even the most aggressive estimates from a              

decade ago, and it is not expected to slow down anytime soon. (Figure 4) 

 

Figure 4: U.S. PV Installation Forecast, 2010-2022  21

 

Although environmentally friendly, PVs introduce new problems for the electrical grid because            

the generated power must either be stored or used immediately. Typically, generated energy is              

consumed by household load and any remainder is sold back to the grid. This may seem like a                  

sustainable system, but it poses serious technical challenges when deployed at scale. In some              

regions, PV penetration is so high that more energy is pumped back into the grid than the grid                  

can handle, resulting in a condition called overvoltage. The grid must respond by curtailing              22

production to remove excess energy or risk damaging its infrastructure. Furthermore, solar            

generation is intermittent and is affected by local cloud cover and weather conditions. This              

20 “Electricity Explained: Factors Affecting Electricity Prices.” ​U.S. Energy Information Administration. 
https://www.eia.gov/energyexplained/index.cfm?page=electricity_factors_affecting_prices 
21 http://www.seia.org/research-resources/solar-market-insight-report-2017-q2 
22Mulkern, Anne C. “A Solar Boom So Successful, It’s Been Halted.” ​Scientific American​. (20 Dec. 2013) 
https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/a-solar-boom-so-successfull-its-been-halted/ 

14 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

intermittency causes rapid drop-offs or increases in produced energy which must be buffered by              

other energy producers to maintain grid stability.  23

 

Perhaps the most well known example of the challenges that are created as a result of high                 

solar penetration is the so called Duck Curve , shown in Figure 5. 24

 

 

Figure 5: California’s electrical load on April 17, 2017  25

 

Colloquially named for the silhouette of a duck, this curve shows two peaks in              

hydrocarbon-based power production (blue line) during the morning and night. The problem is             

that solar energy is only generated during the day, but the peak load demand is in the evening.                  

Therefore, power plants must quickly ramp-up generation by 50% or more as sunlight wanes.              

This process is inefficient and challenges the capabilities of large power plants. On some days               

in California, the solar production mid-day is so high that CAISO actually pays solar              26 27

generators to ​not​ produce energy. This process is known as “curtailment”.  

23 Fares, Robert. “Renewable Energy Intermittency Explained: Challenges, Solutions, and Opportunities.” 
Scientific American​. (11 March 2015) 
https://blogs.scientificamerican.com/plugged-in/renewable-energy-intermittency-explained-challenges-sol
utions-and-opportunities/ 
24St. John, Jeff.“The California Duck Curve is Real, and Bigger than Expected.” ​GTM. ​(3 Nov. 2016) 
https://www.greentechmedia.com/articles/read/the-california-duck-curve-is-real-and-bigger-than-expected 
25 http://www.seia.org/research-resources/solar-market-insight-report-2017-q2 
26Paulos, Bentham. “Too Much of a Good Thing?: An Illustrated Guide to Solar Curtailment on California’s 
Grid.”​ GTM​. (3 April 2017) 
https://www.greentechmedia.com/articles/read/An-Illustrated-Guide-to-Solar-Curtailment-in-California 
27 California ISO, http://www.caiso.com/Pages/default.aspx 

15 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

If energy storage capabilities had grown at the same rate as PV adoption, the Duck Curve                

would not exist. Fortunately, breakthroughs in battery manufacturing are driving down storage            

costs (Figure 6). The levelized cost of energy storage (LCOS) is now as low as $0.13USD per                 28

warrantied kilowatt-hour , a figure making batteries economically viable ​now if retail energy            29

were priced dynamically like wholesale energy.   30

 

Figure 6: Average Price of Energy Storage  31

28Mearin, Lucan. “Without Tesla’s Batteries, the Power Grid Could Fail.” ​ComputerWorld from IDG. ​(27 
April 2015) 
http://www.computerworld.com/article/2915338/sustainable-it/without-batteries-like-teslas-the-power-grid-
could-eventually-break.html  
29 Explanation of a warrantied kWh, https://www.solarquotes.com.au/blog/powerwall-2-warranty/ 
30 Solar Quotes, https://www.solarquotes.com.au/battery-storage/comparison-table/ 
31 https://www.solarquotes.com.au/ 

16 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

2.5 Using Ethereum in Electricity Markets 

An often overlooked aspect of public cryptocurrencies is that of ​user agency​. In short, ​user               32

agency is the concept that the user is in charge of her assets at all times, and those assets are                    

easily exchangeable for other assets. Users of public cryptocurrencies secure their own funds             

and authorize their own transactions. Public blockchains enable consumers to make payments            

using any “tokenized” asset.  

 

Grid+ provides an accounting layer for the energy ecosystem by utilizing Ethereum smart             

contracts. Users retain control of their own assets and can choose exactly how they are utilized                

in the system. By moving the transaction logic for both energy and payments onto a trustless                

architecture (blockchain + state channels), Grid+ reduces the administrative burden of           

processing transactions over legacy rails (traditional payment processors typically charge fees           

of 1.5 - 2.5% ). Additionally, by pushing market signals to customers, Grid+ enables customers              33

to make smarter decisions about their energy usage. This lowers their own costs, while also               

increasing the efficiency, robustness, and reliability of the electrical grid as a whole. 

 

In this section, key terms related to the Grid+ technology stack are defined. Readers              

knowledgeable about Ethereum and related concepts may skip these definitions. 

2.5.1 Ethereum 

Ethereum is a readable, writable, and programmable ledger accessible to any individual with an              

Internet connection. Thousands of users all over the world run software (each of these users is                

running a “node”) that maintain the ledger and these users are financially incentivized by the               

system itself to do so. Any user (even ones not running a node) may write a program and                  

upload it to Ethereum. To do so requires some amount of ether, Ethereum’s underlying              

currency, be paid to the owner of the node which appends the program to the ledger. 

 

The program, now uploaded to the Ethereum “blockchain” (a specific kind of ledger), will live on                

for as long as at least one person continues to run an Ethereum node. The program cannot be                  

changed and anyone may interact with it. A program on the ledger is called a “smart contract”, a                  

term coined in 1994 by Nick Szabo to describe a piece of code capable of executing some                 

32 User Agency and IoT Identity.” ​Grid+​. (30 May 2017) 
https://blog.gridplus.io/grid-3-user-agency-and-iot-identity-ce36239b9e2b 
33“Credit Card Processing Fees and Costs.”​ Value Penguin. 
https://www.valuepenguin.com/what-credit-card-processing-fees-costs 

17 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

function within a decentralized ledger. Smart contracts can be trusted by anyone to execute              34

exactly as-specified in their code, and the code itself is publically visible on the ledger. Once                

deployed to Ethereum, these pieces of logic cannot be tampered with, destroyed, or restricted              

by any party in any way. 

2.5.2 Tokens 

In the context of Ethereum, smart contracts colloquially referred to as “tokens” include a              

minimum set of functionality defined by a community standard called ERC-20. This standard             35

exists to ensure all tokens have the same minimal functionality (e.g. ability to be transferred)               

and facilitates token interoperability. 

 

Tokens can represent anything. For example, Alex could issue Alex Coin, redeemable (only by              

Alex) for 1 hour of his labor. Nick Johnson , one of Ethereum’s core developers, created               36

BeerCoin, stating “​a person's BeerCoin is only as valuable as the recipient's belief that they're good                

for the beer, should it ever be redeemed”. Tokens can also be issued and backed by fiat money                  37

deposits from a trusted organization or government. Such tokens might then be redeemable for the               

issued fiat currency (e.g. US dollars) by the issuing institution. Grid+ believes that fiat backed stable                

tokens will enable far more commerce to be conducted using Ethereum’s rails in lieu of traditional                

payment processors. 

2.5.3 Stable Tokens 

A problem that has plagued digital currencies since their inception is price volatility.             

Cryptocurrencies (e.g. ether, bitcoin) underlying decentralized protocols (Ethereum, Bitcoin) are          

not issued by central institutions. Thus, they are not backed by anything but trust that there will                 

be future demand both for the protocol and its native token. This leads to rampant speculation                

which, in immature markets, leads to huge slips in liquidity and large price volatility. 
 

The future of money cannot depend on volatile assets, which is why stable tokens have               

remained a popular topic of conversation. Although difficult to implement on the Bitcoin             

blockchain, stable tokens are simple to issue on Ethereum since all that is needed is an                

institution to back them. If a trusted counterparty has a large reserve of U.S. dollars, it can mint                  

USD tokens and sell them for $1 on a currency exchange. Those minted tokens can now move                 

34Szabo, Nick. “Smart Contracts.” http://w-uh.com/download/WECSmartContracts.pdf 
35 Ethereum EIPs, ERC20, https://github.com/ethereum/eips/issues/20 
36 Nick Johnson, https://twitter.com/nicksdjohnson?lang=en 
37Johnson, Nick. “Introducing BeerCoin.” ​Reddit. ​(Aug. 2016) 
https://www.reddit.com/r/ethereum/comments/4v7opj/introducing_beercoin/ 

18 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

through the Ethereum ecosystem freely until some user chooses to redeem her tokens in              

exchange for a bank wire. 

2.5.4 Payment Channels 

Although tokens can move from user to user (and also from user to smart contract), each one of                  

these transfers (called “transactions”) require that the global Ethereum ledger be updated. A             

transaction requires the requester pay ether to the node making the ledger update. Before              

seeing the updated token balances, all users must wait for the next ledger update, which takes                

about 15 seconds in Ethereum. 

 

It is not feasible for mainstream users to create a transaction every time they want to buy                 

something. Both Bitcoin and Ethereum have seen massive network congestion as a result of              38

increasing popularity, but much of that traffic can be ameliorated using technology called             

payment channels. 

 

As an analogy, imagine you are at a bar and plan to stay there all night. If you open a new tab                      

and close it out after paying for each round, you must sign multiple receipts and the bar incurs                  

multiple transaction fees from their payment processor (this is why they always ask if you want                

to leave a tab open). If you instead keep your tab open across several rounds, you need only                  

sign one receipt at the end and you save the bar some amount in transaction fees. 

 

The concept is similar in Ethereum. Instead of creating 1,000 ledger updates, one can open a                

payment channel and instead pass 1,000 mathematical proofs that prove the sender can pay              

some number of tokens to the receiver. These can be verified outside of Ethereum (“off-chain”)               

and only one proof (typically the last one) is needed to close the channel. Thus, one thousand                 

transactions can be reduced to two: one to open the channel and one to close it. Simple                 39

payment channels like the ones Grid+ uses are easy to design today, but more complicated               

state channels are an ongoing topic of research and experimentation. (Appendix) 

38“Mempool Size.” ​Blockchain​. https://blockchain.info/charts/mempool-size?timespan=1year 
39Miller, Alex. “A Simple Ethereum Payment Channel Implementation.” ​Grid+. ​(12 June 2017) 
https://blog.gridplus.io/a-simple-ethereum-payment-channel-implementation-2d320d1fad93 

19 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

2.5.5 Proof of Stake and Casper 

Readers familiar with Ethereum will be well aware of the coming Casper implementation of              40

“Proof-of-Stake”. Casper (and more broadly Proof-of-Stake) is a significant upgrade to the            

Ethereum protocol expected to be deployed around Q1 2018. At a high level, Casper allows               

users who own ether to deposit it to a smart contract and then become permissioned to update                 

the ledger. If one or more of these bonded validators act out of turn or attempts to update the                   

ledger in a way which violates state transition rules, those changes will be rejected by the                

broader set of stakers and those fraudulent validators will lose their entire ether deposit. If               

instead these validators act honestly, they earn some amount of ether commensurate with the              

fees in the transactions they have processed. 

 

Note that this process of “validating” transactions in Casper requires that users cryptographically             

“sign” data stating that they believe the data is factual and will induce a valid update of the                  

ledger. This has some security implications which will be discussed later.  

 

Although the transition to Casper will not affect how Grid+ operates (in that it will not change                 

Ethereum’s usability), this protocol upgrade will be referenced later for other purposes. For more              

information, see Vitalik Buterin’s article on proof of stake as well as his other writings on                41

Casper (in the same blog). 
 

 

 

  

40 Ethereum Research, Casper 
https://github.com/ethereum/research/blob/master/casper4/papers/casper_paper.md 
41Buterin, Vitalik. “A Proof of Stake Design Philosophy.” ​Medium.​ (30 Dec. 2016) 
https://medium.com/@VitalikButerin/a-proof-of-stake-design-philosophy-506585978d51 

20 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

3 Value Propositions 
Ethereum brings several efficiencies to the energy industry, an industry historically slow to adopt              

new technology. In January two Grid+ team members, Alex Miller and Mark D’Agostino,             

presented to a large group of European energy retailers at a conference hosted by Rockstart               42

in Amsterdam. Alex and Mark discovered each utility had a budget set aside for innovation               

projects, but most were hesitant to adopt a cutting edge technology such as Ethereum. Grid+               

believes the organizational intransigence of often state-franchised monopolies offers a          

competitive advantage for Grid+. 

 

Grid+ can immediately introduce efficiencies to electricity retailing by leveraging the public            

Ethereum blockchain. This creates incentives for consumers to invest in distributed energy            

storage, which will ultimately make renewable energy production more sustainable and efficient.            

There are many advantages to the proposed Grid+ system, which are broadly grouped into              

short and long term value propositions. 

42 Rockstart Smart Energy Accelerator, https://www.rockstart.com/accelerator/smart-energy/ 

21 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

3.1 Short Term - Energy Retailer 

Grid+ will operate as a commercial electricity retailer in deregulated markets. There are             

fundamental efficiencies Ethereum offers that will help Grid+ significantly undercut costs of            

incumbent utilities. Approximately 50% of a retailer’s cost are not associated with the purchase              

of wholesale energy and can potentially be removed through better technology and more             

efficient processes. 

3.1.1 Lower Variable Costs 

Billing and settlement remain a largely manual process (think spreadsheets, calls to the bank,              

and paper mail) for retailers. All these processes can be automated, and likely will be at some                 

point, with or without Grid+ (automation is coming for us all ). Automation will reduce overhead               43

costs, allowing Grid+ to lower consumer utility bills. 

 

In addition to automation (which itself is an efficiency), Grid+ also introduces the efficiency of               

user agency​, which means that Grid+ do not need to process transactions itself - the Ethereum                

network takes care of that. All payments are recorded automatically and moved from one smart               

contract (a payment channel) to another smart contract (the fee vault, which is called              

Karabraxos - more on this later), without needing traditional payment processors. Thus, the only              

variable cost associated with accounting and payments will be the costs of executing smart              

contracts on the network, and these costs are largely mitigated by payment channels. 

3.1.2 Eliminating Bad Debts 

In addition to foregoing centralized payment processing, ​user agency also allows Grid+ to             

eliminate costs related to risk. Rather than pooling risk as legacy utilities do, Grid+ will require                

customers to pay for their electricity in real-time via currency stored on their agent device. As                

the customer uses electricity their agent (an automated, always-on appliance) will make            

payments, via a payment channel, at each billing cycle in real-time (every 15 minutes or one                

hour, depending on the local ISO). In addition to adding currency to their agent (either ether or                 

the Grid+ stable coin, BOLT), Grid+ will require customers make a refundable deposit that can               

be partially drawn-down if the agent fails to pay on time. The deposit serves two purposes. First,                 

it prevents interruptions in service if connectivity is lost. Second, it provides a buffer if the agent                 

runs out of funds. Grid+ customers will be notified as their deposit is consumed, and once it                 

43 “Humans Need Not Apply.” ​CGP Grey​. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7Pq-S557XQU 

22 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

reaches some lower threshold, the customer will be notified of service termination. Customers             

will always be able to top-off deposits if their deposits get partially utilized. Real-time payments               

coupled with the deposits will prevent the accumulation of bad debt in any meaningful quantity. 

3.1.3 Lower Marketing Expenses 

Grid+ will offer a significantly lower price of electricity compared to incumbent retailers which will               

likely lower the cost of customer acquisition over time (~$150 for current retailers ). Grid+              44

anticipates initially spending more on customer acquisition, than the incumbent retailers, as it             

establishes its brand and presence in existing markets. However, Grid+ also anticipates            

customer acquisition costs decreasing over time. Since Grid+ is able to offer substantially lower              

prices, it will have much lower customer turnover, which can be as high has 30% per year for                  

traditional retailers in deregulated markets.   45

3.2 Long Term - Distributed Storage and Open Markets  

Since customers are given nearly frictionless access to the wholesale energy markets, they will              

experience market-driven price fluctuations, which will enable their agents to make smarter            

decisions about consumption. As the price of storage (i.e. batteries) drops, there will eventually              

come a time when, it is in a rational consumer’s economic interest to purchase a battery to                 

arbitrage energy prices and provide ancillary services to the electric grid. 

3.2.1 Enabling Efficient Markets 

The computation and allocation of costs associated with using the distribution network introduce             

some of the largest inefficiencies in today's electrical grid. Fees are billed in a non-dynamic way,                

socializing the cost of the infrastructure over all market participants on a per kWh usage basis.                

Presently, pricing does not consider that each customer's kWh represent different real costs due              

to variations in geography, network connection topology, and time of use. This socialization of              

cost disincentivizes the adoption of DERs leading to economically irrational outcomes. With the             

adoption of smart-meter technology at each node in the grid, including the customer endpoints,              

the data needed for computing real-time dynamic distribution costs will become available.  

44Drummond, Iain and Josh Lutton. “Reducing Customer Acquisition Costs.” ​Woodland Associates​. (28 
Feb. 2013) https://woodlawnassociates.com/electrical-potential-solar-and-competitive-electricity/ 
45 Borràs, David and Javier Serra. “Churn Management in Utilities.” ​Arthur D. Little. ​(2015) 
http://www.adlittle.com/downloads/tx_adlreports/ADL_Churn_management_in_utilities.pdf 

23 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

3.2.2 Natively Support P2P Markets 

Geographically and topologically segmented markets will emerge once dynamic, granular          

locational marginal pricing (LMP) is implemented on the distribution grid. Once this occurs there              

will be situations where customers will not want to interact with wholesale markets directly, but               

rather trade energy locally. At this point customers will be able to utilize Ethereum to facilitate                

the exchange of energy directly in a peer-to-peer manner, rather than clearing on a centralized               

market. Trading will be limited to customers of Grid+ or other participating retailers until              

regulators make accommodations for P2P markets generally. 

3.2.3 Integrate ISO Wholesale Markets 

The problems that are faced by retail electricity markets, namely inefficient mechanisms for             

accounting and settlement, as well as counterparty risk, are also issues in the ISO-operated              

wholesale markets. Unlike the retail markets, the wholesale markets include far fewer            

participants, but have much larger trade sizes.  

 

Wholesale markets trade what are called “forward contracts”, which is a contract promising to              

deliver energy at some future time. Therefore, there are considerable counterparty risks when             

interacting in a market where some participants trade forward contracts. This risk has             

manifested itself a number of times and has cost market participants and consumers large              

amounts of capital with the most recent large failure being the bailout of Constellation Energy.               46

NASDAQ has also realized that trading of financial instruments can benefit from blockchain             

technology and have developed their own platform, Linq. In the long term Grid+ anticipates              47

extending the technology developed for the residential business into the ISO operated            

wholesale markets, at which point there would be no distinction between retail and wholesale              

markets.  

 

  

46Hancock, Jay . “The Messed-up Wholesale Electricity Market.” (17 Jan. 2011) 
http://www.mresearch.com/pdfs/455.pdf 
47“Building on the Blockchain.” ​NASDAQ​ (March 2016) 
http://business.nasdaq.com/Docs/Blockchain%20Report%20March%202016_tcm5044-26461.pdf 

24 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

4 Intelligent Agent 

 

The vast majority of customers who sign up for Grid+ will have no desire to learn how                 

cryptocurrencies work. Grid+ is building a seamless solution that leverages the power of the              

public Ethereum network without requiring users possess a high degree of technical aptitude.             

One critical piece of the system that makes this possible is the Grid+ agent device, an                

always-on, Internet-aware device shown in Figure 7. 

25 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 
Figure 7: Grid+ Agent Prototype 

 

4.1 Basic Usage 

At its core, the Grid+ agent is a computer that pays for a customer’s electricity usage in real 

time. After the agent is registered, the customer purchases U.S. dollar stable tokens (called 

BOLT) from Grid+ with a credit card or bank transfer. Once the payment settles, these BOLT 

tokens are transferred to the user’s agent. As long as the agent holds BOLT, it may read from 

the household smart meter and pay for the electricity usage in real-time. A schematic of this 

process is shown in Figure 8. 

Figure 8: Basic agent process 

 

26 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

A customer may get started with Grid+ by signing up, purchasing an agent, registering that 

agent, and buying BOLT on the Grid+ web console. The customer does not need to do anything 

else until the agent runs out of BOLT (note that Grid+ will offer an automatic-payment option).  

4.2 Agent Registration & Key Generation 

Before shipping agent devices, Grid+ registers the serial number from the device in the Grid+               

registry contract. Only Grid+ can register devices in this contract, which ensures unsupported             48

devices do not report data and cannot make transactions. After registering the device, its serial               

number is mapped to an Ethereum address generated by Grid+. 

 

Once delivered to the customer, the agent may be registered with a serial number found inside                

the box. This maps the owner’s wallet address to the serial number, which is itself associated                

with the agent’s digital identifier. The agent is capable of making digital signatures from a               49

secure hardware enclave and may act autonomously while still being registered with Grid+ and              

owned by the customer. 

 

There is clearly a problem with the registration workflow, and it may be obvious to some of the                  

more advanced crypto users. If the device signs messages with the key Grid+ generated, this               

defeats the purpose of ​user agency and makes Grid+ responsible for its security. Thus, the               

device must generate its own key after the user claims it.  

 

The technical details of this process are based on the following two lines of Solidity (an 

Ethereum programming language ) code in the Grid+ registry contract: 50

 

mapping (bytes32 => address) registry; 

mapping (bytes32 => address) owners; 

 

The first line maps a hash of the agent device’s serial number to an address. For each issued                  

agent device, Grid+ assigns a serial number and generates a setup key on the device. Grid+                

then calls a function on the registry contract to whitelist the setup key. After the setup key (on                  

48 Grid+, Contracts, https://github.com/GridPlus/Contracts/blob/master/Registry.sol 
49Specifically the agent will make ECDSA (Elliptic Curve Digital Signature Algorithm) signatures using the 
secp256k1 curve. These signatures are presently required to participate in Ethereum and the 
corresponding cryptographic key pairs serve as the agents’ digital identities.  
50Solidity documentation, https://solidity.readthedocs.io/en/develop/ 

27 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

device) is registered, it is seeded with a small amount of ether and the agent is shipped to the                   

user.  

 

Once the user receives and boots the device for the first time, it will automatically generate a                 

new key-pair and call the registry contract to replace its setup key with the new wallet key-pair.                 

Only the consumer has access to the newly created private key, thus she now has ​user agency​.                 

Further, to ensure utmost transparency, Grid+ has open sourced all its client code, which it               

welcomes the broader community to thoroughly review.  

 

The second mapping above is set by the human user claiming a device. The owner must have a                  

serial number on hand and may only claim a device that was registered by Grid+. To see how                  

this works in action, please explore the Grid+ demo application.   51

4.3 Advanced Usage 

The design of Grid+ system architecture is shown in Figure 9. 

 

Figure 9: Grid+ System Architecture 

For additional security, Grid+ will allow the use of a multi-signature wallet. For those unfamiliar               

with this concept, it is relatively simple. In order to initiate a transaction to move funds or trigger                  

51Grid+ Demo Application, https://app.gridplus.io 

28 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

a contract, the transaction requires ECDSA signatures from more than one private key. A user               

can create a 2 of 3 multisig contract account which requires at least 2 of the 3 keys to sign any                     

given transaction. Grid+ plans to use a simple multisig utilizing detached signatures as             52

designed by Dr. Christian Lundkvist. Under Metropolis (Ethereum’s next major update),           

multi-signature wallet contracts will be able to transact as normal accounts . 53

The multisig scheme prevents a hacker from gaining access to customer funds if the agent               

device is hacked. The benefits of ​user agency are nullified if an attacker can connect to your wifi                  

and break into your agent to move your agent’s BOLT and ether into another account. The                

diagram above shows MS1, MS2, and MS3 - which all represent different private keys in a                

multisig setup. This allows a user to utilize a ​vault​ setup wherein she can deposit larger sums.  

Practically, this means a user is ​always in control of her funds (MS2 + MS3). In a situation                  

where the agent device is stolen/destroyed, the user still maintains the ability to access her vault                

(MS1 + MS2). This setup scheme allows large amounts of value to be stored - outside of the                  

agent device’s hot wallet. While this setup is ​recommended​, it is not required. Multisig              

transactions incur a larger transaction fee (although this may not be true in future versions of                

Ethereum ) and there exists some economic trade-off between security and cost which can be              54

different for each user. In a scenario where a casual user spends $50 per month on energy, she                  

may be willing to store that on her agent’s hot wallet. When energy bills are in the hundreds or                   

thousands of dollars, or a user wishes to store six months of electricity worth of cryptocurrency                

on the agent, she may desire the additional level of security provided by a multisig account.  

4.4 Agent Energy Trading 

To better understand what decisions an agent makes on behalf of a user, the reader must first                 

understand some of the intricacies of the electricity market. 

 

It was previously stated that Independent System Operators (ISOs) manage wholesale markets            

wherein producers sell electricity and utilities buy it for resale to their customers. This is a simple                 

description, but it is also a gross oversimplification of how wholesale electricity markets work.              

Wholesale markets have much higher degrees of complexity, largely driven by the fact that load               

on the electrical grid must match, nearly exactly, the generation at any given point in time. If                 

52 Christian Lundkvist, Simple-multisig, https://github.com/christianlundkvist/simple-multisig 
53 Ethereum EIP 86, https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/pull/208 
54 Ethereum EIPs, Signature Abstraction, https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/pull/208 

29 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

generation significantly deviates from load either a high-voltage or low-voltage situation occurs,            

either of which can severely damage equipment attached to the network. ISOs have created              

systems that help manage the grid in a stable manner throughout the day, but prefer to use                 

market mechanisms to coordinate consumers and producers in such a way as to keep the grid                

balanced. To ensure this goal, ISOs have created markets in which they incentivize the              

coordination of disparate interests. Three of largest markets are day-ahead, real-time, and            

demand response. 

 

4.4.1 Day-Ahead and Real-Time Markets 

One of the mechanisms that helps to maintain the stability of the grid is the ability to forecast                  

both demand and production. ISOs operate what are known as day-ahead-markets which            

allows both generators and utilities to buy and sell forward contracts on electricity for one day in                 

the future. These markets typically operate in 1 hour windows, such that from 1pm to 2pm on a                  

given day, market participants bid on the forwards for 1pm to 2pm the following day. The                

forwards market is locked in by 2pm, and the corresponding parties are then contractually              

obligated to produce or consume the specified amount of energy the following day from 1pm to                

2pm. This gives the generators time to plan their production to match what the market believes                

will be the demand one day in advance. The ability to plan ahead helps producers manage their                 

operations and supply chains in a manner that is significantly more efficient and minimizes              55

drastic changes in demand on other generators in the network. This also incentivizes             

consumers to try and accurately predict their consumption one day ahead because they can              

mitigate price volatility in real-time markets since prices in the day-ahead markets are often less               

expensive.  

 

The real-time market is exactly as it sounds. It is the market for buying and selling energy in                  

real-time or near real-time. Depending on the specific market there can actually be one or               

multiple markets that fall within the real-time designation; such as 1 hour, 15 minutes, or 5                

minutes. The difference between the real-time prices and the day-ahead prices for the Maine              

interconnection on June 11th, 2017 are shown below in Figure 10. 

55 Marcel Antal et al. “A System of Systems Approach for Data Centers Optimization and Integration into 
Smart Energy Grids.” ​Science Direct.​ (24 May 2017) 
http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X17310129 

30 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

 

Figure 10: LMP for Maine Node 06/11/2017​  56

 

How much energy will a user need tomorrow? Should she buy it in the day-ahead markets,                

real-time markets, or some combination thereof? These are questions a smart agent device can              

answer. Normally, this decision is made by a utility which is not strongly incentivized to optimize                

costs for individual consumers. Instead, they attempt to minimize overall volatility, and socialize             

the average cost of energy throughout the day over their customer base. Most utilities will               

charge their customers a flat rate regardless of how much electricity their customers use, when               

they use it, or how much it actually costs to buy. The flat rate is based on the average wholesale                    

price plus some non-negligible markup (~30-50%).   57

 

Although energy storage has many benefits and is an ideal distributed resource to be controlled               

by independent smart agents in real-time, the fact remains that there does not yet exist a high                 

degree of energy storage penetration in the market place. This will likely change in the near                

56 https://www.iso-ne.com/isoexpress/web/charts 
57Bohi, Douglas R. and Karen L. Palmer. “The Efficiency of Wholesale vs. Retail Competition in 
Electricity.” ​The Electricity Journal. 
https://www.hks.harvard.edu/hepg/Papers/Bohi_Palmer_Efficiency_1096.pdf 

31 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

future as market incentives are updated to accommodate the burden renewables place on the              58

grid. In the proposed scenario wherein residential customers have access to real-time pricing in              

the wholesale market, the incentive for installing energy storage exists. Customers with energy             

storage can have their agent conduct temporal energy arbitrage and generate revenue. This             

can be done simply by buying electricity when it is cheap and selling it back or consuming it                  

when energy is expensive. For example, if electricity is -$0.10/kWh from 6-8am (a price not               

inconceivable based on Figure 10) and +$0.25/kWh from 4-6pm, a savvy arbitrageur would be              

able to net +$0.35/kWh. For a Tesla Powerwall II , this would generate around $3.5 per day or                 59

$1275 dollars per year, allowing the Powerwall to pay for itself within six years. (Appendix) 

4.4.2 Demand Response 

Although ISOs can control the generation side of the electrical grid through day-ahead and              

real-time energy markets, they must employ other methods to incentivize loads and ensure grid              

balance. One of these balancing techniques is called demand response. Rather than paying             

generators to produce more energy, ISOs can pay consumers who have flexibility in their loads               

to shut-down those loads for a short period of time. This creates a new set of opportunities for a                   

customer’s agent to react to the economics of the demand response market.  

 

The Nest smart-thermostat is an example of what is known as a dispatchable load. A               60

customer’s agent can monitor the demand response markets and, if configured to do so, use a                

Nest to turn off heating or air conditioning for a short period of time in order to earn revenue.                   

The grid’s market signals for demand response can be broadcast to all nearby Grid+ agents,               

which can offer bids stating they will turn off their household air conditioning if a certain price is                  

paid. If enough bids are made to satisfy the ISO’s resource increment requirement (usually 100               

kWh), then the aggregate bid would be broadcast into the demand response market by Grid+.               

The revenue that is generated from the service could then be sent to participating agents. 

 

In addition to offering services to demand response signals, a customer’s agent could also use               

the Nest to intelligently control the home’s temperature based on the real-time market prices.              

For example, if the price of electricity is usually highest at 7pm, the thermostat could cool the                 

house 2 degrees below the set temperature of the house by say 6:30pm and then allow the                 

house to rise 2 degrees above the set temperature by 7:30. This in turn saves the customer                 

58Miller, Alex. “The Future of Energy Markets.” ​Grid+​. (18 May 2017) 
https://blog.gridplus.io/gridx-the-future-of-energy-markets-da104c285363 
59 Tesla Powerwall, https://www.tesla.com/es_ES/powerwall?redirect=no 
60 NEST thermostat, https://nest.com/thermostat/meet-nest-thermostat/ 

32 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

money by avoiding expected consumption of energy at peak prices. Moreover, there are also              

situations wherein the real-time price of electricity can spike in excess of 3-5 times the average                

electricity cost due to shortfalls in generation and/or congestion in distribution. (Figure 10) If the               

agent knew that the home was already within the consumer’s pre-configured comfortable            

temperature range, it could choose to forego purchasing energy for 15 minutes in anticipation              

that the electricity rate will normalize in the near future.  

 

As more of the user’s devices are connected to the agent, it will be able to make even more                   

intelligent consumption decisions. For example, if you own a TESLA, you might normally come              

home from work and start charging your car. If your agent knows that you aren’t going out                 

tonight, it could defer charging the car until the early hours of the morning when electricity is                 

significantly less expensive. Both Nest and Tesla provide APIs that can be used to interface               

these devices with the Grid+ system. 

 

It is important to highlight the value of smart devices that moderate a customer’s electricity               

consumption profile. These IoT devices on their own hold valuable data, but lack the ability to                

transact on a shared financial infrastructure and create an economic benefit for their owner. The               

Grid+ smart energy agent is the central point of both the financial connectivity and decision               

making for a customer’s collection IoT devices.  

 

4.4.3 Intelligent Economically Driven Decisions 

The decision-making capabilities of the agent will be further enhanced as information sharing             

between customer and agent increases. For example, if your smart phone periodically            

broadcasts your location to your agent, the agent would be able to figure out when you are                 

leaving the house, and when you are coming back. If you stay late at work, or decide to go                   

downtown on a date, your agent would know to delay cooling the house until you are on your                  

way home. Say you have a conference in Portland, your agent could look at your calendar and                 

determine that you will not be home for the next three days. It could then decide not to purchase                   

as much energy in the day-ahead markets because it will know that you will not need to run your                   

AC system.  

 

Note: This could result in privacy concerns for some users, however the data that is transmitted                

from the Grid+ smartphone app will be encrypted with the agent’s public key and will only be                 

readable locally by the customer-controlled agent.  

33 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

4.5 Secondary Uses of the Agent 

The Grid+ agent device is integral to the Grid+ system; however, Grid+ imagines other users in                

the Ethereum ecosystem will benefit from it as well. The Grid+ agent is a standalone computer                

with natively integrated hardware and software for the Ethereum protocol. The agent will             

maintain its own Ethereum light client, which is designed for resource-constrained computing            

environments. Users will be able to utilize the agent for transaction signing in a secure               61

enclave. The security topology of the Grid+ system will enable secure and robust storage of               

cryptocurrency, secure signing of prepare and commit transactions in Proof-of-Stake with           

Casper, and a secure cryptocurrency API for IoT devices.  

4.5.1 Storing Cryptocurrency 

Ever since the earliest days of Bitcoin, securely storing cryptocurrency has been a primary              

concern and a challenge for many users. Although there have been a number of advances               

beginning with paper wallets, multi-signature accounts, and hardware wallets, all of these            

methods largely depend upon assets being stored offline to maintain security. Offline wallets             

create significant friction in signature creation, and multisignature wallets introduce “social           

latency”. Furthermore, physical wallets rely upon the availability of a single device or safe              

storage of a single plaintext backup. Fundamentally, both the air gapped nature of incumbent              

methodologies as well as the transactional friction introduced make these methods incompatible            

with an efficient, frictionless economy of the future. This is most apparent when it comes to                

using cryptocurrency in IoT applications such as the transactive grid.  

 

Taking this into account, Grid+ proposes a new security architecture that combines all of the               

state-of-the-art methods of securing cryptocurrencies into a single system. The multi-signature           

system coupled with a secure hardware enclave, secure computing transaction verification,           

physical second factor verification, and segregation of key storage, creates a system where             

users will be able to reliably and safely store larger amounts of cryptocurrency in a               

standard-setting, secure, robust, and high availability (almost always online) way. 

4.5.2 Proof-of-Stake Signing  

After the implementation of Casper, Ethereum stakers will need to ensure online connectivity             

with near-zero downtime, or else risk a negative interest rate on deposits. Thus, many in the                

61Ethereum, Light client protocol, https://github.com/ethereum/wiki/wiki/Light-client-protocol 

34 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

space believe running instances on Azure or AWS, which have nearly 100% uptime, is the most                

desirable option. But storing private keys in the cloud will put potentially billions of dollars worth                

of ether at risk. 
 

The Grid+ agent can serve the purpose of a “Casper-in-the-Box” remote signer. A user may run                

the Casper protocol in AWS or Azure and pass the raw, unsigned transaction details to the                

Grid+ agent device. The agent would then locally sign the staking transactions. This ensures              

that private keys never leave the protection of a secure enclave, under the staker’s supervision.               

Once again - this structure coincides with the Grid+ team’s strong belief in ​user agency​. Even                

more interesting is to imagine using an application running on top of Ethereum to provide the                

data to help secure the network. One could envision that a staker might outsource              

computational jobs to Golem , or iExec , and have unsigned transactions with provable,            62 63

appropriate data returned to the agent device. The agent would pay for those computations in               

GNT or RLC, then sign and broadcast the transaction details constructed using purchased             

computation. All data analysis is done via an Ethereum application and transactional data is              

signed on a customer’s agent. Thus, the Grid+ agent can potentially secure the Ethereum              

ecosystem running Casper without ever leaving the Ethereum rails.  

4.5.3 Ethereum API for IoT 

Although the secondary use cases may appear to only be serving a niche use case, over time                 

Grid+ anticipates the agent could be game changing to cryptocurrency adoption. The initial use              

case of signing processed transactions during the Casper implementation is a small one.             

However, in the future the Grid+ agent can serve as a financial gateway for all IoT devices. If                  

the projections for IoT enabled devices are true, these types of agent devices connected to the                

Ethereum network could be of profound importance. By 2020 it is estimated there will be 20                

billion connected devices that will need to transact value. The Ethereum network can serve as               64

the transactional layer for a device connected world. However, having all IoT devices sign              

Ethereum transactions will be inherently insecure, thus using a proxy agent to sign on behalf of                

other IoT devices is a logical construct. Therefore, Grid+ is developing a RESTful API through               

which other IoT devices can connect to the Grid+ agent and send or receive payments in a                 

simple, secure, and permissioned way. Grid+ imagines this device will become standard as IoT              

becomes ubiquitous.  

62Golem Network, https://golem.network/ 
63iExec project, http://iex.ec/ 
64Gartner Newsroom, (7 Feb. 2017) http://www.gartner.com/newsroom/id/3598917 

35 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

4.6 Integration and Testing 

Is this all theoretical, or has Grid+ actually implemented the above designs? The Grid+ team felt                

it was necessary to do real world testing prior to announcing this design pattern to the world.                 

Over the past year, working in conjunction with one of the world’s largest energy companies, the                

Grid+ team has deployed code onto a specific 3kWh smart-battery from a European producer.              

Grid+ has proven the concept and is now rewriting much of that code in a lower level language                  

for what will be a large, production deployment. Grid+ is working with some of the most                

progressive energy companies in the world, and looks forward to experimenting on larger             

batteries (such as the 14kWh Tesla Powerwall). It is important to note that both the Grid+ design                 

and its ambitions to operate multiple retailers do ​not rely upon meaningful penetration of              

distributed energy storage in any of the markets serviced by Grid+. Storage capabilities opens              

up many additional revenue streams for Grid+ customers (including offering ancillary services to             

the grid), but Ethereum by itself can still enable lower cost electricity via dis-intermediation and               

user agency​.  

36 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

5 Tokens 
Note: This section is undergoing active structuring with leading law firms. While we do not 
expect major rewrites, some of this section may change in the future. In the event of a change, 
the whitepaper version number will be incremented. 

Grid+ will operate with a two-token model, with each token being ERC-20 compliant. The              65

BOLT token is a stable-coin, redeemable by Grid+ customers for $1 worth of energy and backed                

by USD deposits. The GRID token allows Grid+ customers to purchase electricity at wholesale              

price. Each GRID token may be redeemed for a certain amount of electricity at wholesale price,                

with that number being a function of the total supply. 

5.1 The BOLT Token 

BOLT is the currency required to use the Grid+ platform. It is a stable currency, with each BOLT                  

redeemable for $1 worth of energy on the Grid+ platform at all times. BOLTs are only created                 

65 The Merkle, What is the ERC20 Ethereum Token Standard? 
https://themerkle.com/what-is-the-erc20-ethereum-token-standard/ 

37 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

when customers deposit fiat (or ether, which is sold for fiat) to Grid+ and are destroyed when                 

Grid+ customers redeem BOLT for USD. These creation and destruction events are defined             

according to a technical specification first proposed by a member of the Grid+ team, Alex Miller.               

The customer may purchase BOLT tokens directly for her device or may purchase them for                66

her own wallet and move them to her device at any time. Before an agent can pay for energy, it                    

must open a payment channel with Grid+ by depositing BOLT, a process that occurs              

automatically. Both energy wholesale costs and fees are taken from this BOLT deposit when the               

channel is closed. 

5.1.1 BOLT Redemption 

Any Grid+ customer who holds BOLT is free to exchange them for fiat money at any time. This                  

requires KYC (which occurs when the customer signs up for Grid+ service) as well as a fee                 

associated with initiating a bank transfer. In the event of redemption, BOLTs are destroyed and               

the token supply is decreased.  67

5.1.2 The Fee Vault: Karabraxos 

Grid+ does​ not ​collect fees directly; rather they are routed from each closed payment channel to 

a smart contract known as Karabraxos, which can be found at ​karabraxos.eth ​.​ ​(Figure 11) 

The main purpose of Karabraxos is for Grid+ to be transparent about the number of BOLT it is 

earning and for the public to have some idea of how much liquidity will be available for usage in 

Raiden when available. 

 

Note that Karabraxos holds BOLT collected both from retail electricity customers ​and​ from fees 

generated by the Grid+ Raiden hub. 

66Ethereum EIP621, https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/pull/621 
67BOLT contract, https://github.com/GridPlus/contracts/blob/master/BOLT.sol; ​see also ​EIP 621, 
https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/pull/621 

38 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

Figure 11: Artist’s conception of Karabraxos 

5.3 The GRID Token 

A fixed number of GRID tokens will be created once and sold in the upcoming Grid+ token sale. 

Each GRID token is a credit on the Grid+ platform, redeemable at any time for electricity (in 

kWh) at wholesale cost. At the time of redemption, GRID tokens are converted to a fixed 

number of kWh (a function of the current supply) and assigned a timestamp by the redemption 

contract. Once redeemed, GRID are taken out of supply forever via a mechanism modeled after 

EIP 661.  68

5.3.1 GRID redemption 
GRID tokens are redeemed for wholesale electricity on-chain:  
 
function redeem(bytes32[3] sig, uint amount) { 
    ERC20 grid = ERC20(GRID_ADDRESS); 
    if (!grid.provable_redeem(sig, amount)) { throw; } 
    uint kwh = getKwh(amount); 
    Redemption(msg.sender, amount, kwh, now); 

68 https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/issues/661 

39 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

} 
 
This function provably redeems GRID tokens using the specification outlined in EIP 662.  This 69

redemption removes GRID tokens from the sender’s balance and also from the total GRID 

supply. Once redeemed, a ​Redemption ​event  is emitted by the contract, linking the agent’s 70

address to the number of GRID redeemed as well as the number of kWh credited through this 

redemption. The ​getKwh ​function is as follows: 

 
function getKwh(uint amount) returns (uint) { 
    ERC20 grid = ERC20(GRID_ADDRESS); 
    uint grid_amount = safeMul(amount, 100); 
    uint kwh = safeDiv(safeMul(grid.initialSupply, grid_amount), 
grid.totalSupply); 
    if (kwh > 50000000000000000000000) { kwh = 
50000000000000000000000; } 
    return kwh; 
} 
 
Note that only a percentage of total electricity sold by Grid+ can be purchased at wholesale 

using GRID per unit time.  

 

The number of kWh received per GRID redeemed is a function of the number of GRID tokens in 

existence at the time of redemption, with a ceiling of 50,000 kWh/GRID and a starting reward of 

100 kWh/GRID. This ceiling is reached when the total GRID supply decreases to approximately 

0.5% of the initial supply and holds until there are no more GRID left. 

 

A projected redemption reward curve is shown in Figure 12 using an initial GRID supply of 

200,000,000. Note that the GRID supply has not yet been finalized and this is simply an 

example. 

 

69 https://github.com/ethereum/EIPs/issues/662 
70 Ethereum StackExchange, What is an event? 
https://ethereum.stackexchange.com/questions/11228/what-is-an-event 

40 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 
Figure 12: Expected GRID reward 

5.3.2 Applying Wholesale kWh 
Once GRID have been redeemed and an event emitted, the Grid+ hub reads that event and 

references it when billing the agent in the future. A typical bill  includes the following: 71

 
{ 
  price: 0.1,            // units of $/kWh 
  wholesale_price: 0.08  // units of $/kWh 
  amount: 1,             // units of kWh 
} 
 

In this simple billing example, the customer used 1 kWh of power. If the agent has recently 

redeemed GRID (recorded in the ​Redemption ​ event), the wholesale price is passed to the 

customer and the customer pays $0.08, with no additional markup. If a customer has no amount 

of redeemed GRID associated with the agent, the customer pays the normal Grid+ price of 

$0.10. 

 

For example, suppose a customer has redeemed GRID and been credited 10 kWh at wholesale 

price. If the above bill was issued to the agent, it would pay $0.08 and the wholesale credits 

would be reduced from 10 kWh to 9 kWh (because this bill used 1 kWh). This credit (now 9 

71 Note that there are other pieces of billing data irrelevant to this discussion. 

41 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

kWh) would decrease with each subsequent bill until it hits 0 kWh, at which point the agent 

would return to paying the normal Grid+ price (wholesale + markup). 

  

42 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

 

6 Business Model 
Grid+ revenue will be generated from markup on wholesale energy prices, transaction fees,             

interest on capital backing BOLT tokens, and sales of agents. Grid+ will drive energy prices as                

low as possible and operate the energy business near-cost in the long-term (i.e. paying for               

expenses, but making little-to-no profit off of the energy fees charged). 

6.1 Markup on Energy 

Grid+ will charge its customers for the price of energy they purchase in the wholesale market,                

the fees associated with its distribution, as well as a percent markup over these latter two costs.                 

Figure 13 shows the average wholesale cost of electricity in Texas over time. Note that in 2016                 

roughly half of the cost of residential electricity represented the markup by retailers. 

43 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 
Figure 13: Wholesale vs Residential Pricing 

 

Grid+ will charge 20% above the wholesale + distribution cost implying a cost of $0.068/kWh,               

for the Texas market, compared to the current average retail cost of $0.115/kWh. This would               

provide a customer savings of ~38%. Based on the projected number of customers during the               

Tesla Epoch (see Roadmap below), this would lead to $16 to 32mm in net revenue per year                 

generated from electricity sales. 

 

The mandatory use of deposits results in the complete removal of bad debt expenses, which               

creates a competitive advantage over incumbent retailers. The deposit model creates a            

somewhat hidden virtuous cycle. Customers who are likely to default on payments will be              

unwilling to post a deposit and join the Grid+ platform. Thus, high credit risk customers are                

pushed onto incumbent retailers, thereby increasing Grid+’s competitive advantage over time. 

6.2 Raiden Network Transaction Fees 

Given its system design, Grid+ is poised to become one of the largest stable-coin issuing               

entities on the public Ethereum network. Issuing large amounts of fiat tokens puts Grid+ in a                

unique situation to act as a central bazaar for a great deal of commerce on the public Ethereum                  

network. Grid+ anticipates the ability to operate a large fiat hub on the Raiden network with a                 

44 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

significant amount of liquidity. With this hub established, Grid+ foresees a secondary revenue             

source: charging fees on microtransactions inside the Grid+ Raiden hub. 

These Raiden fees should not be conflated with Grid+ fees. The former is simply to pay for                 

using the Grid+ Raiden hub to conduct commerce (outside of Grid+), while the latter is a markup                 

on energy to pay for Grid+ costs. Note that no Raiden fees will be added to channels open for                   

Grid+ services (i.e. Grid+ will not have double-fees). Also note that Raiden fees, like all other                

fees in Grid+, go to Karabraxos (which is intended to capture ​all​ revenue streams of Grid+). 

Grid+ will work to capture market share in the early days of Raiden, rather than maximize short                 

term revenue generated through the hub. Therefore, the fees charged will be extremely low (on               

the order of $0.0001 per tx). As of this writing, the average cost of a transaction on the Visa                   

network is 2% of the transaction cost + $0.10, thus for a $10 transaction, the fee would be                  

$0.30. Although one could argue that Grid+ only needs to beat Visa, the team believes it must                 72

strive to beat the costs of the public Ethereum network as well. Currently, the median cost for a                  

simple transfer is $0.11 on the public Ethereum network. Thus, the expected transfer fee for a                73

$10 payment in the Grid+ Raiden hub will be 0.033% the cost or the Visa transaction and 0.05%                  

of the public Ethereum transaction. This means Grid+ Raiden hub transactions will be             

2,000-3,000 times less expensive than typical payment costs. It is not inconceivable that other              

commerce will look to utilize BOLT inside of the Grid+ Raiden hub to capitalize on these                

extremely low costs.  

6.3 Interest on BOLT deposits 

The fiat currency backing BOLT will be used by Grid+ to pay for the wholesale electricity when                 

BOLT is redeemed by a consumer for electricity. Note that any time fiat is used to pay for bills, a                    

corresponding number of BOLT tokens will be burned within Karabraxos. If not enough BOLT              

tokens can be burned, the number of BOLT to be burned will be recorded and another burn                 

event will be attempted after more fees have been collected. 

 

In the time period between when the consumer buys the BOLT and the electricity is consumed,                

Grid+ will invest the monies in low-risk assets such as treasury bills. Assuming that US treasury                

72“Visa and Mastercard US Interchange Rates.” ​Helcim​. 
https://www.helcim.com/us/pricing/visa-mastercard-interchange-rates/ 
73ETH Gas Station, http://ethgasstation.info/ 

45 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

bills will yield 1% this will generate revenues of $272,000 - $544,000 per year during the Tesla                 

Epoch (Q2 2018- Q1 2019). 

6.4 Sales of Agents 

All Grid+ customers will require an agent device, whose estimated manufacturing cost is near              

$50. This device offers substantially more functionality than a Trezor or Ledger hardware             74 75

device at a lower price point. Although this is a potential revenue stream, Grid+ will sell agents                 

at cost, as they are the gateway to the Grid+ platform and enable the revenue described above                 

to grow. 

6.5 Roadmap 

The Grid+ roadmap starts by assuming relatively low battery and solar penetration and focuses              

primarily on developing the smart-energy agent and its software as well as rolling out utilities in                

targeted regions. In later phases, Grid+ will assume higher DER penetration. 

6.5.1 Phase 1: Edison Epoch (Q4 2017 - Q2 2018) 

During this period, Grid+ will establish a single utility in a targeted region and sign up 5,000+                 

customers. These customers will be charged electricity at cost in order to grow the Grid+ brand.                

This will also be a period of rapid improvement to Grid+ software and hardware components. 

6.5.1.1 First Utility 

Grid+ will begin the Edison Epoch by applying for creation of a utility in a deregulated market                 

within the United States. At the time of writing this, no market has been selected, but the target                  

markets have been narrowed down to a short list. 

 

Grid+ will need to contract with a marketer who is familiar with marketing utilities. This sounds                

like a specialised task, but it is a fairly common skill in deregulated, competitive markets               

(because the churn rate is fairly high for utilities). 

6.5.1.2 Agent Prototype 

Before developing the software, Grid+ will need a stable hardware prototype of the agent to               

ensure the development environment will remain constant. This prototype should come from a             

74Trezor, https://trezor.io/ 
75Ledger,  https://www.ledgerwallet.com/ 

46 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

production process that is at least scalable to a few thousand devices, but need not be scalable                 

to millions.  

 

During this phase Grid+ will hire three hardware engineers to finalize the first production              

hardware device. Karl Kreder will oversee the agent prototyping, testing, and production. 

6.5.1.3 Establish Content Delivery Network 

Before making upgrades to the agent device client , Grid+ needs to establish a process in               76

which the agent device fetches updates from the hub. This is critical to streamlining upgrades               

and enabling fast iteration. The software team, led by Alex Miller, will spend much of this phase                 

developing a content delivery network (CDN) - this will mostly be on the server side. The                

software team will also build the plumbing (remote logging, updates, etc.) for the client to               

operate in whatever agent environment is chosen. 

6.5.1.4 Updates to the Client 

The Edison phase will see rapid development in the client. Grid+ will hire two additional software                

engineers, primarily for development of the client. This client will have bare minimum             

functionality (signup, open payment channels, withdrawals). 

 

The software team will also spend more time on the REST API of the Grid+ hub, which will be                   

similarly limited in functionality. The end of this phase will be marked by a v1.0 release on the                  

releases page  of the Grid+ client. 77

6.5.2 Phase 2: Tesla Epoch (Q2 2018 - Q1 2019) 

During this period, Grid+ plans to acquire 100,000-200,000 customers in 2-4 markets and will              

increase the liquidity of the BOLT token by decreasing transaction fees through the             

establishment of a Raiden hub. 

6.5.2.1 Scalable Hardware Production 

After reaching a v1.0 of the Grid+ agent client, Grid+ will establish an improved production               

process for the hardware. This process will need to scale to 100,000 devices and will require at                 

least two full time manufacturing engineers to ensure Grid+ can meet production quotas. 

76 Grid+ Client, https://github.com/GridPlus/client 
77 Grid+ Client, Releases, https://github.com/GridPlus/client/releases 

47 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

6.5.2.2 More Utilities 

During the Tesla phase Grid+ will create 1-3 more utilities in targeted regions. This will ensure                

the process to create utilities is scalable. Long term, Grid+ hopes to open many utilities               

worldwide, and this is only possible if with a sufficiently streamlined expansion process. Grid+              

will need to contract with several more marketers who are familiar with the respective local               

regions. 

6.5.2.3 Raiden Hub 

Once Grid+ has acquired a sufficient number of customers, it will begin utilizing BOLT liquidity               

(BOLTs are only created when customers make deposits) by establishing a Raiden hub. This is               

both to introduce a new revenue stream (from generalized state channel fees) and also to make                

Grid+ more efficient (migrating simple, custom payment channels to the Raiden network). 

 

This will make Grid+ a prominent hub for stable token (USD) commerce. This will be a big step                  

in facilitating mass adoption of the Ethereum network for payments. 

 

Alex Miller will oversee the software team’s phased migration to the Raiden hub. Grid+ will bring                

in subject-matter expertise from ConsenSys to assist in making a smooth transition. This is one               

of the biggest advantages of being a ConsenSys Formation - Grid+ will have continued access               

to some of the best developers in the Ethereum ecosystem. 

6.5.2.4 Better Decisions from More APIs 

During this phase, Grid+ will allow optional API data feeds to send encrypted information to the                

agent. This will allow better decision-making and more efficient energy usage. Grid+ will need to               

scale its software team to develop the client, expand the API, create an SDK, and make the web                  

system more scalable. 

 

The Tesla Epoch will be marked by a v2.0 release of the Grid+ client. 

6.5.3 Phase 3: Musk Epoch (Q2 2019 and beyond) 

This will be the final of the first three phases, during which Grid+ will globally expand its utilities                  

network and sign up many more customers. At this point, Grid+ must have a scalable process in                 

place to facilitate this expansion.  

48 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

6.5.3.1 Full Hardware Production Scalability 

During this phase Grid+ will need to establish a production process to allow for millions of                

devices to be manufactured. This must be extremely scalable and will require a large ramp-up in                

hiring hardware engineers and process managers. Because Grid+ will likely need to contract             

with multiple hardware manufacturers, it is important for the agent to be built from sufficiently               

commoditized parts. 

6.5.3.2 Agent AI Optimization 

With the client software at v2, Grid+ will now dedicate much of its software development time to                 

optimizing agent decision-making by designing better artificial intelligence to leverage incoming           

API data from sufficiently abstracted data feeds. This will require scaling the software team to               

include data scientists and AI experts. This will likely happen in several stages and at that time                 

Grid+ will likely draft an updated roadmap. 

6.5.3.3 International Utilities Expansion 

While Grid+ will be forming many more utilities in the U.S., it will also look to expand globally in                   

targeted regions. This will require growth of the strategy team, which is overseen by Mark               

D’Agostino. 

6.6 Use of Funds 

Funds from the token sale will be used in several ways over several Epochs detailed in the 

roadmap. (Figures 14-16) It is estimated that Grid+ will spend ~$12mm through the Edison 

Epoch, $36mm during the Tesla Epoch, and $52mm during the Musk Epoch. While building a 

hardware and software product, Grid+ will also be required to put down deposits in order to form 

utilities in every region of operation. Once a Raiden hub is established, Grid+ will likely convert 

much of its ether to BOLT tokens in order to increase liquidity for stable coin commerce. 

However, it will also maintain ether liquidity in the same Raiden hub. If Grid+ has excess funds 

after setting up retailers in all targeted deregulated markets, it will increase both ether and BOLT 

49 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

liquidity in its Raiden hub.

 
Figure 14: Use of token sale funds during Edison Epoch 

 

 
Figure 15: Use of token sale funds during Tesla Epoch 

50 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 
Figure 16: Use of token sale funds during Musk Epoch 

6.6.1 Forming Utilities 

It is contemplated that a plurality of ether accepted will go toward forming retailers in specifically                

identified deregulated markets. The first utilities will likely be in Texas, California, and New              

England. There are many factors that go into this decision, but the most significant ones are                

smart-meter penetration, regulatory friendliness, and price of electricity - higher prices means            

more room for competition (Figure 17). After starting in the US, Grid+ will seek to expand                

internationally to strategic regions. Right now, the best candidates are Australia, Germany and             

the UK but there are many other possibilities.  

51 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

Figure 17: Regional Average Prices of Electricity in United States  78

The creation of a retailer requires a large deposit, which sits in escrow. This number is greater                 

than $1 million for many regions. It is important to reiterate that these funds are not be “spent”,                  

but rather deposited. 

6.6.2 Legal Work 

Grid+ has been working closely with Matt Corva, general counsel for ConsenSys. Matt has              

intimate knowledge when it comes to the tokenized ecosystem in Ethereum, having worked             

closely alongside Coinbase to draft “A Securities Law Framework for Blockchain Tokens”. Matt             79

78 https://www.eia.gov/electricity/monthly/ 
79Corva, Matt. “A Securities Law Framework for Blockchain Tokens.” ​Coinbase​. (7 Dec. 2016) 
https://www.coinbase.com/legal/securities-law-framework.pdf 

52 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

also led all of the legal work for the Gnosis team, along with top global law firms, to structure                   

their two-token utility system in a legally compliant manner. Matt plans to help put together a                

legal team and provide guidance for Grid+ as it expands operations to ensure Grid+ is always                

compliant with all laws pertinent to the jurisdictions in which it operates.  

6.6.3 Marketing 

In the short term, Grid+ plans to spend a relatively large amount on marketing to acquire its                 

initial customer base. Grid+ will advertise in a highly targeted geographic region and to a highly                

targeted demographic. As the brand gains more notoriety, Grid+ will move to minimal             

marketing/advertising and will let its low energy prices speak for themselves.  

 

Many reading this white paper can attest to the evangelistic effects of a tokenized economy.               

Grid+ imagines GRID token holder-evangelists will do a better job marketing the Grid+ platform              

than Grid+ can do on its own. Even those who are not GRID holders, but are Ethereum                 

enthusiasts, will help push the platform because Grid+ uses the Ethereum rails from start to               

finish. Adoption of Grid+ by definition means adoption for public Ethereum. Grid+ foresees a              

grassroots viral marketing craze propelling Grid+ into mainstream media. 

6.6.4 Product 

The final area where Grid+ plans to deploy substantial resources is in the further development               

of the Grid+ system. Grid+ has a working demo application and has prototyped the hardware               

product, but this will be an iterative process to create and test. Grid+ will need to grow its team                   

and bring together hardware specialists, software engineers, and Ethereum experts to ensure it             

can build a safe, reliable, and desirable agent device. 

53 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

7 Experience and Team 
Prior to the advent of the Frontier deployment of the Ethereum public chain on July 30th 2015,                 80

ConsenSys had already been building and testing applications for the energy ecosystem. The             

first project began in May of 2015, which was a ConsenSys-led joint venture to construct the                

TransactiveGrid. Championed by ConsenSys Enterprise partner John Lilic and senior          81

technologist Dr. Christian Lundkvisk, the TransactiveGrid proved that electrical energy could be            

tokenized on Ethereum and transacted across a distributed network.  

 

Through the Brooklyn TransactiveGrid project of 2015, ConsenSys came to the realization that             

the public Ethereum blockchain infrastructure was seriously deficient, and thus discontinued the            

project in 2016. Since then, the ecosystem has experienced rapid growth in developer             

infrastructure. Tools such as Truffle , MetaMask , INFURA , ​a​n​d ​MyEtherWallet allow          82 83 84 85

80Ethereum Frontier Guide, https://ethereum.gitbooks.io/frontier-guide/content/ 
81DEVCON1, TransactiveGrid, https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kq8RPbFz5UU 
82Truffle, http://truffle.readthedocs.io/en/latest/ 
83MetaMask, https://metamask.io/ 

54 

https://infura.io/
https://infura.io/
https://infura.io/


Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

developers to rapidly prototype Ethereum applications and seamlessly integrate them into the            

user’s browser.  

 

Since the TransactiveGrid, the ConsenSys Energy team has been engaged in a number of              

projects with various utilities around the world. ConsenSys began joint development on a             

platform called Co-tricity alongside RWE Group , which was recently rebranded as Innogy.            86 87 88

This joint development helped validate assumptions about the energy markets and           

demonstrated the expanded roles utilities can play in a world with decentralized grid             

infrastructure. 

 

For the past 12 months, the ConsenSys Energy and Enterprise teams have serviced multiple              

Fortune Global 50 Energy companies. ConsenSys has built models akin to the TransactiveGrid,             

albeit utilizing much more scalable design patterns. During these pilot projects ConsenSys            

developed two fully decentralized exchanges, one using a continuous auction model and the             

other using batch/uniform pricing. ConsenSys also explored the intersection of IoT and            

Ethereum, giving smart-batteries the ability to utilize ECDSA (Elliptic Curve Digital Signature            

Algorithm), specifically the secp256k1 curve, by signing and broadcasting Ethereum          

transactions on behalf of their owners. One Enterprise project, which involves swarms of smart              

batteries, is currently in the pilot phase with code running in a production environment in the                

homes of select participants in Europe. 

 

The ConsenSys Enterprise group lives by the modus operandi of ‘customer led development’.             

This ensures that ConsenSys enters engagements with open minds and that it learns from its               

clients, who are the true subject matter experts in their industries. Many startups, especially              

those in the blockchain ecosystem, fail to achieve increased efficiency by naively applying new              

technology to existing industry processes. ConsenSys brings Ethereum expertise to industry           

leaders and learns from their experiences. ConsenSys has spent two years working with some              

of the brightest minds in the energy space, which has culminated in the formation of Grid+. The                 

Grid+ team leverages experience from other ConsenSys teams, Ethereum startups, and           

massive Fortune Global 50 energy companies to design a system that will fundamentally             

change the way consumers interact with their energy providers.  

84INFURA, https://infura.io/ 
85MYEtherWallet, https://www.myetherwallet.com/ 
86DEVCON2, Co-Tricity https://consensys.net/static/devcon2/cotricity/Cotricity_Master_Slides.pdf 
87RWE Group, https://www.rwe.com/web/cms/en/8/rwe/ 
88Innogy, https://iam.innogy.com/en/ueber-innogy 

55 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

7.1 Team: 

7.1.1 Alex Miller 

Alex is a software engineer with a background in applied physics. He discovered Ethereum in               

2015 when he was working for a fin-tech startup that moved ~$2 payments between users with                

traditional payments infrastructure. He left that world for the greener pastures of permissionless             

innovation and joined ConsenSys in 2016. He has been the technical lead on multiple Fortune               

500 Enterprise energy client engagements and has a passion for developing Ethereum and IoT              

infrastructure.  

7.1.2 Karl Kreder 

Karl recently graduated from The University of Texas at Austin, where he received his PhD in                

Materials Science researching advanced battery technologies. Prior to attaining his PhD, Karl            

worked at Southwest Research Institute where he started the Energy Storage System            

Evaluation and Safety (EssEs) consortium which performed testing, characterization, and          

research on large format lithium ion batteries for >10 kWh energy storage. The EssEs              

consortium had 12 industry members from 3 continents with a budget of more than $3mm.               

Before joining full time, Karl served as a subject matter expert advisor for the Energy group at                 

ConsenSys. He is now the resident energy guru for all energy-based projects.  

7.1.3 Mark D’Agostino 

Mark has spent the past decade in management consulting, specifically focused on the financial              

services industry. Prior to joining ConsenSys as a managing partner in the Enterprise group,              

Mark built out Deloitte’s blockchain market offering. He has successfully delivered           

Ethereum-based applications to Fortune 500 banks, global energy companies and          

governments. Over his career, he has served clients such as AIG, BlackRock, Citi, GE, JPM,               

Lehman Brothers, MasterCard, and Pfizer. He has been the ConsenSys lead for all Energy              

consulting engagements and has worked closely with a number of utilities and global energy              

companies. Mark has decided to step back from an Enterprise delivery role to spend more time                

focused on product development and strategic leadership within ConsenSys.  

 

56 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

7.1.4 Claudia Pop 

Claudia is a PhD student and a teaching assistant, at Technical University of Cluj-Napoca, 

Romania.  She likes exploring the computer science world, thus she went from building sumo 

robots to implementing projects to digitize the local community and got involved in European 

research projects. She is passionate about her teaching role at the University and always tries 

to have an impact.  Besides her interest in computer science, she enjoys hiking, cooking and 

singing. 

 

7.1.5 Rachel Epstein 

Rachel recently graduated from Cardozo Law School with a law masters degree specializing in 

Intellectual Property law. While at Cardozo she worked as a researcher for Professor Aaron 

Wright on a book about the legal implications of blockchain technology and assisted in providing 

legal help for NYC based startups as part of the Cardozo Tech Startup Clinic. Rachel is 

passionate about the legal policies developing around the implementation of blockchains and 

enjoys writing about the tokenization of securities. She joined ConsenSys’s legal team in 2017. 

7.2 Advisors 

7.2.1 Joseph Lubin 

Joe is a co-founder of Ethereum and the founder of ConsenSys. He has an academic               

background in Electrical Engineering and Computer Science from Princeton University and has            

research experience in the field of Robotics Learning. Joe is a former VP of Technology at                

Goldman Sachs in the Private Wealth Management Division. 

7.2.2 Jeffrey Char 

Mr. Char is a serial entrepreneur and investor. He is Founder and CEO of J-Seed Ventures, Inc.                 

and Chief Mentor of Venture Generation, a Tokyo-based venture community. He is also Director              

of Corporate Venture Capital and a member of the Innovation Task Force at Tokyo Electric               

Power Company (TSE: 9501). Mr. Char is also an adjunct professor who teaches             

entrepreneurship at IE Business School in Spain. He founded and built several successful             

57 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

ventures including Sozon, an online marketing company sold to ValueCommerce (TSE Mothers:            

2491), Solis, a domain registrar sold to GMO Internet (TSE: 9449), SSK Technology, an              

electronics component company sold to Suzuki Manufacturing, and Pario Software, a network            

security company sold to Lucent Technologies (NYSE: ALU). Prior to becoming an entrepreneur             

Mr. Char was a corporate attorney in Silicon Valley and securities research analyst in Tokyo. He                

studied economics at Sophia University in Tokyo and law at the University of California,              

Berkeley and Harvard Law School.  

7.2.3 Rikiyai Abe  

Professor Abe has a degree in Electronics Engineering from the University of Tokyo and a PhD                

from the University of Kyushu. Formerly, he has had roles at J-POWER, a Japan-wide              

wholesale power company; and the Electric Power Research Institute (EPRI) as a visiting             

researcher to the United States. Since 2008, Professor Abe has focused on Technological             

Management for Innovation (TMI). Since June 2012, Professor Abe has served as Co-Chair of              

the Presidential Endowed Chair at the Electric Power Network Innovation by Digital Grid, at the               

University of Tokyo. Professor Abe has developed the digital grid concept, which represents a              

"power Internet". He is also a Representative Director at the Digital Grid Consortium. His              

interests include renewable energy, energy storage and smart grid. 

 
7.2.4 John Lilic 

John has been working at the intersection of distributed energy resource development and             

blockchain technologies since 2013 with past projects that include the Brooklyn Microgrid, the             

TransActive Grid, Project Exergy, collaboration with RWE/Innogy as well as helping drive            

engagements and interactions with utilities and power companies around the world as they             

explore Ethereum and its value proposition to the grid.  

7.2.5 Matt Corva 

Matt Corva is General Counsel for ConsenSys. Matt is particularly interested in the disruption              

triggered by decentralizing technologies and the implications of that disruption on legacy legal             

frameworks. In addition to overseeing ConsenSys legal issues, Matt frequently speaks at            

conferences and educates large law firms on Ethereum and blockchain technology. Matt holds a              

law degree from Washington and Lee University and is licensed to practice in New York. 

58 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

7.2.6 Igor Lilic 

Igor is a full-stack software engineer at ConsenSys, formerly a senior consultant at             

ThoughtWorks, software development engineer at Amazon Web Services, OANDA, SAP and           

AMD. He is the CTO and co-founder of the Enterprise group at ConsenSys and has been active                 

in the crypto space since 2012. Igor wrote the Proof of Physical Address (PoPA) system and                

has been integral in the delivery of most client engagements at ConsenSys. He helped structure               

ConsenSys’ largest Energy delivery to date and is currently shifting focus to product             

development. 

7.2.7 Mike Goldin 

Mike began working on applications for the Ethereum blockchain during the summer of 2015 as               

an intern at ConsenSys, where he worked on the smart contract backend for Ujo Music. He                

joined ConsenSys full-time after graduating from Columbia University with a degree in computer             

science. He worked as a software developer and architect in the ConsenSys Enterprise group              

where he built complex simulations to be used in distributed energy applications. He is now the                

technical lead for ConsenSys AdTech. 

7.2.8 Bashar Lazaar 

Upon graduating from Babson College with a B.Sc., Bashar has focused his early career in               

structuring energy projects across the Middle East and North Africa combining knowledge in             

finance and renewable energies to deliver financial engineering for utility scale PV & Wind              

power plant development in the MENA region. While employed at SunEdison, Bashar took a              

keen interest in Ethereum’s potential implementation within the energy sector, and made a shift              

to ConsenSys, where he contributed to launching its MENA operation and establishing the             

Dubai office. Bashar currently serves as an advisor and financial engineer for the Grid+ team.  

59 



Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

 

8 Appendix 

8.1 State Channels Research 

How offchain trading will work Martin Koeppelmann 

Ethereum Lightning Network and Beyond Robert McCone 

State Channels Jeff Coleman 

Raiden: Scaling Out With Offchain State Networks Heiko Hees 

Epicenter Bitcoin: State Networks Jeff Coleman 

Universal Payment Channels Jehan Tremback 

60 

http://altheamesh.com/blog/universal-payment-channels/
http://forum.groupgnosis.com/t/how-offchain-trading-will-work/63
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v0ZJDsRYnbA
http://www.arcturnus.com/ethereum-lightning-network-and-beyond/
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=h791zjvf3uQ
http://www.jeffcoleman.ca/state-channels/


Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

Scalability via State Channels Martin Koeppelmann 

Ethereum: Platform Review (page 30) Vitalik Buterin 

Sparky: A Lightning Network in Two Pages of Solidity Dennis Peterson 
 

An Introduction to State Channels in Depth Ameen Soleimani 

State Channels Wiki Jeff Coleman 

Gamble Channels: Fast Verifiable Off-Chain Gambling Denis Peterson 

Toy State Channels Jeff Coleman 

Raiden Network Brainbot 

Machinomy Sergey Ukustov 

8.2 Tesla Powerwall Payback Calculations 

ROI Overview 

Total Cost  Yearly Revenue  Payback Period (Years) 

14kWh Powerwall $5,500       

Supporting 

Hardware $700  Days/Year 365  Total Cost $7,600 

Average Installation 

Cost $1,400  Revenue/Day $3.50  Revenue/Year $1,277.50 

 $7,600   $1,277.50   5.95 

Revenue Calculations 

6-8AM to Charge (Daily 

Revenue)  4-6pm Peak Sale (Daily Revenue)  Combined Revenue 

Energy Cost (kWh) $ (0.10)  Energy Cost (kWh) $0.15  Charge $1.40 

Powerwall Size 14 kWh  Powerwall Size 14 kWh  Sell $2.10 

 $1.40   $2.10  Total $3.50 

61 

http://www.blunderingcode.com/a-lightning-network-in-two-pages-of-solidity/
http://static1.squarespace.com/static/55f73743e4b051cfcc0b02cf/t/57506f387da24ff6bdecb3c1/1464889147417/Ethereum_Paper.pdf
https://github.com/machinomy/machinomy
https://github.com/ledgerlabs/toy-state-channels/tree/master/contracts
https://github.com/raiden-network/raiden
http://www.blunderingcode.com/gamble-channels-fast-verifiable-off-chain-gambling/
https://github.com/ledgerlabs/state-channels/wiki
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MEL50CVOcH4
http://de.slideshare.net/MartinKppelmann/state-channels-and-scalibility


Grid+ Whitepaper v1.6 

 

62 


